Tennessee, session 114, HB2309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-408(c)(1), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(C) Notwithstanding § 40-35-111, in addition to any sentence imposed for a
violation of subdivision (b)(1), if the offense occurred at a house of worship, the court
must include as part of the sentence a fine of no less than two (2) times the total amount
of any property damage or loss or cleaning and restoration expenses incurred by the
house of worship as a result of the offense.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2309
012081
- 1 -